New York, session 2025-2026, A11281.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 239-bb of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 4 South Nassau Water Authority created pursuant to title five-B and the 5 North Shore Water Authority created pursuant to title five-A of article 6 five of the public authorities law shall remain eligible for funding 7 from the clean water, clean air, and green jobs environmental bond act 8 fund pursuant to section ninety-seven-tttt of the state finance law in 9 state fiscal year two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty-seven. 10 § 2. Title 5-A of article 5 of the public authorities law, as added by 11 chapter 575 of the laws of 2021, is renumbered title 5-B and sections 12 1114-a through 1114-s, as added by chapter 575 of the laws of 2021, are 13 renumbered sections 1114-aa through 1114-ss. 14 § 3. Subdivisions 1 and 12 of section 1114-bb of the public authori- 15 ties law, as added by chapter 575 of the laws of 2021 and such section 16 as renumbered by section two of this act, are amended to read as 17 follows: 18 1. "Authority" shall mean the corporation created by section eleven 19 hundred [fourteen-d] fourteen-dd of this title. 20 12. "District" shall mean the water authority of South Nassau water 21 district created by section eleven hundred [fourteen-c] fourteen-cc of 22 this title. 23 § 4. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 4 of section 1114-gg of the public 24 authorities law, as added by chapter 575 of the laws of 2021 and such 25 section as renumbered by section two of this act, is amended to read as 26 follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00460-01-5 A. 11281 2 1 (j) vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers 2 and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include 3 any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by 4 the bondholders pursuant to section eleven hundred [fourteen-h] four- 5 teen-hh of this title and limiting or abrogating the rights of the bond- 6 holders to appoint a trustee under such section or limiting the rights, 7 duties and powers of such trustee; 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.